Maryland, session 2025, HB0760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY APPROVE A PROJECT WITHIN THE
JURISDICTION OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT WAS PREVIOUSLY DENIED
BY THE MARYLAND HISTORICAL TRUST AS A RESULT OF:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0760*

HOUSE BILL 760
(1) THE PROTECTION OF CEMETERIES UNDER § 14–121.1 OF THE
REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(2) THE FOLLOWING FUNCTIONS UNDER TITLE 5A, SUBTITLE 3 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE:
(I) HISTORIC PRESERVATION REVIEW FOR STATE PROJECTS;
OR
(II) PERMITTING FOR TERRESTRIAL OR SUBMERGED
ARCHAEOLOGICAL INVESTIGATIONS.
(B) (1) ON REQUEST OF A PROJECT APPLICANT, A LOCAL PLANNING
COMMISSION SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING ON THE PROJECT.
(2) THE LOCAL PLANNING COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) HOLD THE PUBLIC HEARING WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE
DATE ON WHICH THE APPLICANT REQUESTS THE HEARING;
(II) PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE HEARING AT LEAST ONCE IN A
NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY AND ON
THE PLANNING COMMISSION’S WEBSITE; AND
(III) MAKE A RECOMMENDATION TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ON WHETHER TO APPROVE THE PROJECT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.